Hawaii statutes.
§342F-9 Penalties. (a) Violation of
the vehicular noise control rules adopted by the department pursuant to this
chapter shall constitute a violation as defined in section 701-107 and shall be
enforceable by police officers. The fine for this violation shall be not less
than $25 nor more than $2,500 for each separate offense. Each day of violation
shall constitute a separate offense.

(b) Any person who violates this chapter, any
rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, other than vehicular noise control
rules, or any permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fined
not more than $10,000 for each separate offense. Each day of each violation
shall constitute a separate offense. Any action taken in environmental court
to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection, other than
the penalty imposed for violations of vehicular noise control rules, shall be
considered a civil action.

(c) Any person who denies, obstructs, or
hampers the entrance or inspection by any duly authorized officer or employee
of the department of any building, place, or vehicle that the officer or
employee is authorized to enter and inspect shall be fined not more than $500.
Any action taken in environmental court to impose or collect the penalty provided
for in this subsection shall be considered a civil action. [L 1989, c 212, pt
of §3; am L 1991, c 157, §14; am L 1995, c 180, §17; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next